Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3294
District; recreation area; regulate pets and other animals; violation; penalty.

(1) A district may permit pets, domestic animals, and poultry to be brought upon, possessed, grazed, maintained, or run at large in all or any portion of a recreation area.

(2) Any person who brings upon, possesses, grazes, maintains, or allows to run at large any pet, domestic animal, or poultry in a recreation area when not permitted by the district shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 6.